Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.925

Judicial review of prior administrative orders.

Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the *effective date of this chapter are governed by RCW 21.20.440 except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within sixty days after the *effective date of this chapter.

[ 1959 c 282 s 66.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "effective date of this chapter" is midnight June 10, 1959, see preface 1959 session laws.